swahili/swahili.xfst
define Velar g;
define Alveolar d | z;
define Stop p | t | k;
define Fricative s | ʃ | f | v;
define Vowel a | e | i | o | u;

define UVowelization u -> w || _ "^" Vowel;


define NOne n -> ɲ || .#. _ "^" Vowel;
define NTwo n -> 0 || .#. _ "^" Fricative;
define NThree [n "^" l] -> [n "^" d] || .#. _;
define NFour n -> ŋ || .#. _ "^" Velar;
define NFive n -> n || .#. _ "^" Alveolar;
define NSix [n "^" p] -> ["^" p h], [n "^" t] -> ["^" t h], [n "^" k] -> ["^" k h] || .#. _;
define NSeven [n "^" w] -> [m "^" b], [n "^" b] -> [m "^" b] || .#. _;
define NRule NOne .o. NTwo .o. NThree .o. NFour .o. NFive .o. NSix .o. NSeven;

define VOne t -> [t h] || .#. _ u "^" ;

define del1 "^" -> 0;
define ExtraSymbolDeletion del1;

read lexc swahili.lexc
define Lexicon;

define Grammar Lexicon .o. UVowelization .o. NRule .o. VOne .o. ExtraSymbolDeletion;


regex Grammar;
